Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
Provisions for Application of Limitations

413.250.
When action commences.

An action shall be deemed to commence on the date of the first summons or process issued in good faith from the court having jurisdiction of the cause of action.

History.

2524.

413.260.
Effect of injunction or other restraint on limitation.

If the doing of an act necessary to save any right or benefit is restrained or suspended by injunction or other lawful restraint, vacancy in office, absence of an officer or his refusal to act, the time covered by the injunction, restraint, vacancy, absence or refusal to act shall not be counted in the application of any statute of limitations.

When the collection of a judgment or the commencement of an action is stayed by injunction, the time of continuance of the injunction shall not be counted as part of the period limited for the collection of the judgment or the commencement of the action.

History.

2535, 2544.

413.265.
Validity of agreements extending limitations periods.

Written agreements entered into in good faith and at arms length to extend limitations periods for the filing of civil actions, including agreements entered into prior to July 15, 1988, shall be valid and enforceable according to their terms.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 268, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

413.270.
Effect of judgment of no jurisdiction — Application to administrative agencies.

If an action is commenced in due time and in good faith in any court of this state and the defendants or any of them make defense, and it is adjudged that the court has no jurisdiction of the action, the plaintiff or his representative may, within ninety (90) days from the time of that judgment, commence a new action in the proper court. The time between the commencement of the first and last action shall not be counted in applying any statute of limitation.

As used in this section, “court” means all courts, commissions, and boards which are judicial or quasi-judicial tribunals authorized by the Constitution or statutes of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or of the United States of America.

History.

2545: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 54, § 1.

413.280.
Person under more than one disability.

When two (2) or more disabilities exist in the same person at the time the cause of action accrues, the limitation does not attach until they are all removed.

History.

2538.

413.290.
Limitations only to residents — Notice.

Limitations shall not begin to run in favor of persons coming temporarily into this state, but shall attach only in favor of actual residents in good faith, and after notice to the person to be affected thereby.

History.

2533.

413.300.
Plaintiff a citizen of enemy country.

If the plaintiff is an alien and a subject or citizen of a country at war with the United States, the time of the continuance of the war shall not be counted as part of the period limited for the commencement of an action.

History.

2534.

413.310.
Plaintiff’s confinement in penitentiary. [Repealed.]

413.320.
Cause of action barred here if barred where it accrued.

When a cause of action has arisen in another state or country, and by the laws of this state or country where the cause of action accrued the time for the commencement of an action thereon is limited to a shorter period of time than the period of limitation prescribed by the laws of this state for a like cause of action, then said action shall be barred in this state at the expiration of said shorter period.

History.

2542: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 206, §§ 1, 2.

413.330.
Action on judgment barred here if barred where rendered — Exception.

If, by the laws of any other state or country, an action upon a judgment or decree rendered in that state or country cannot be maintained there by reason of the lapse of time, and the judgment or decree is incapable of being otherwise enforced there, an action upon it may not be maintained in this state, except in favor of a resident thereof who has had the cause of action from the time it accrued.

History.

2541.

413.340.
Exceptions as to chapter. [Repealed]

History.

2543; 1998, ch. 196, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2015 ch. 121, § 5, effective June 24, 2015.